Hawaii, session 2026, HB2437.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that access to high-quality arts education supports student engagement, academic success, and whole-child development.  The legislature further finds that the state foundation on culture and the arts' artists in the schools program provides meaningful arts learning experiences by embedding professional artists in classrooms to serve students across the public and public charter school system. The artists in the schools program directly aligns with the state foundation on culture and the arts' mission to foster cultural literacy and community engagement by delivering high-quality arts education to underserved students.  By embedding professional artists in classrooms, the program supports the development of critical twenty-first century skills, including creativity, critical thinking, and collaboration, that are essential for future workforce success and engaged citizenship. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds to the state foundation on culture and the arts to fund the artists in the schools program. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $220,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to fund the artists in the schools program. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state foundation on culture and the arts for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________